Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-305
Nebraska State Capitol Environs District; beautification projects; financing.

The State of Nebraska, city of Lincoln, and county of Lancaster may share in financing such activities in any proportions which are mutually agreeable on a three-party basis, or in any combination of two parties. Such entities are also, jointly, singly, or in any combination, empowered to enter into contracts and to receive and expend funds from any private sources or public body, including the federal government, for the purposes described in section 90-304. The State of Nebraska, city of Lincoln, or county of Lancaster may act as a financial agent, project manager, and maintenance agency for one or both of the other governmental bodies in implementing the purposes described in section 90-304.

Laws 1977, LB 172, § 5.